Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.181

Application for certificate of competency.

Any person desiring to be issued a certificate of competency as provided in this chapter shall deliver evidence in a form prescribed by the department affirming that said person has met the qualifications required under RCW 19.28.191 and 19.28.205. An electrician from another jurisdiction applying for a certificate of competency must provide evidence in a form prescribed by the department affirming that the person has the equivalent qualifications to those required under RCW 19.28.191.

[ 2012 c 32 s 2; 2001 c 211 s 12; 1997 c 309 s 2; 1980 c 30 s 3. Formerly RCW 19.28.520.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 32: See note following RCW 19.28.205.